Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6188.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. The general assembly makes the following findings of fact:
(1) In the case of a missing adult with an intellectual disability, the first few hours are
critical in finding such an adult.
(2) A standardized state system is necessary to aid in the search for such an adult.
(3) A coordinated local law enforcement and state agency response with prompt and
widespread sharing of information will improve the chances of finding such an adult.
(4) The implementation of a standardized state system to aid in the search for a missing
adult with an intellectual disability alert program is necessary for the immediate preservation of the
public peace, health, and safety.
SECTION 2. Chapter 42-28 of the General Laws entitled "State Police" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following sections:
42-28-3.7. Missing adult with an intellectual disability -- Purple Alert.
(a) This section shall be known and may be referred to as the "Linda DaLomba Purple Alert
Act."
(b) The division of state police, in consultation with other appropriate agencies including,
without limitation, the department of health, shall institute a voluntary partnership among law
enforcement agencies, media outlets and other appropriate entities to send out emergency alerts
entitled "Purple Alert" to aid in the search for a missing adult with an intellectual disability, as part

of the integrated public alert and warning system ("IPAWS").
(c) For purposes of this section, a "missing adult with an intellectual disability" means:
(1) A person whose whereabouts are unknown;
(2) A person who has a mental or cognitive disability that is not Alzheimer's disease or a
dementia-related disorder; an intellectual disability or a developmental disability, as those terms
are defined in § 40.1-1-8.1 or by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental
disabilities and hospitals (BHDDH); a brain injury; another physical, mental, or emotional
disability that is not related to substance abuse; or a combination of any of these;
(3) A person whose disappearance indicates a credible threat of danger or serious bodily
harm to themself, as determined by the state police or other law enforcement agency;
(4) A person who may not be returned to safety without law enforcement intervention; and
(5) A person who does not meet the criteria for activation of a local "Missing Senior Citizen
Alert" or the Rhode Island State Police Missing Senior Citizen Alert procedures for protocol and
implementation plan.
(d) The missing adult's intellectual disability shall be demonstrated by the appropriate
documentation presented by the missing adult's family, legal guardian, caregiver, medical treatment
provider, or long-term care facility where such adult resides.
(e) The Purple Alert program shall provide a pro-active emergency public alert plan as part
of the response to the disappearance of a missing adult with an intellectual disability that may be
expediently triggered by law enforcement personnel in accordance with protocols, procedures and
rules established by the division of state police pursuant to the provisions of subsection (g) of this
section in consultation with appropriate law enforcement authorities, the Rhode Island emergency
management agency, the department of health, state and local officials and cooperating members
of the broadcast media.
(f) If a law enforcement agency other than the state police has confirmed the disappearance
of a missing adult with an intellectual disability, the law enforcement agency shall obtain
descriptive information for the “Purple Alert,” contact the state police to provide the descriptive
information to the state police and identify a point of contact within its agency.
(g) The division of state police shall establish protocols, procedures and rules to implement
a "Purple Alert." The protocols, procedures and rules shall be updated as may be necessary in
consultation with the entities and agencies involved in the "Purple Alert" process to provide
effective and efficient procedures to assist law enforcement agencies, broadcast media and other
cooperating agencies or entities in carrying out the provisions of the "Purple Alert" system.
(h) The Rhode Island emergency management agency ("RIEMA") shall, no later than
LC002683 - Page 2 of 4

January 1, 2026, and annually thereafter review the policies and procedures implemented and
conducted in accordance with the provisions of this section. The review shall involve all agencies
that participate in IPAWS.
(i) RIEMA shall conduct and keep records for annual training to be provided for all
participating agencies utilizing the IPAWS system. Training pursuant to this subsection shall be
mandatory for all personnel employed and involved in conducting IPAWS Purple Alert operations.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002683
========
LC002683 - Page 3 of 4